Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that access to reproductive health care is a long-established right in Washington state. The people of Washington have repeatedly affirmed this right, and it is the legislature's responsibility to ensure that our residents have access to care that puts patients first regardless of federal actions. Pregnant patients have been able to rely on federal protections when they seek emergency medical care, but due to renewed uncertainty at the federal level, the legislature must provide these rights in state law so that pregnant patients in Washington state have the strongest protections when seeking care. The legislature finds the existing state law, including chapter 70.400 RCW, along with current federal laws ensure that both physicians and hospitals have a shared responsibility to deliver the highest quality of care to pregnant patients to guarantee their legal access to all medically appropriate options.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:When providing emergency services, hospitals shall provide treatment to a pregnant person who comes to the hospital with an emergency medical condition that is consistent with the applicable standard of care for such condition or, if authorized by law, transfer the patient to another hospital capable of providing the treatment, with the informed consent of the patient. If termination of the pregnancy is the treatment that is consistent with the applicable standard of care, the hospital must provide such treatment following and as promptly as dictated by the standard of care or, if authorized by law, transfer the patient to another hospital capable of providing the treatment, with the informed consent of the patient. Neither the continuation of the pregnancy nor the health of any embryo or fetus shall be a basis for withholding care from the pregnant person, and neither the continuation of the pregnancy nor the health of any embryo or fetus shall be prioritized over the health or safety of the pregnant person absent the informed consent of the pregnant person.Sec. 3. RCW 70.170.060 and 2022 c 197 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No hospital or its medical staff shall adopt or maintain admission practices or policies which result in:(a) A significant reduction in the proportion of patients who have no third-party coverage and who are unable to pay for hospital services;(b) A significant reduction in the proportion of individuals admitted for inpatient hospital services for which payment is, or is likely to be, less than the anticipated charges for or costs of such services; or(c) The refusal to admit patients who would be expected to require unusually costly or prolonged treatment for reasons other than those related to the appropriateness of the care available at the hospital.(2) No hospital shall adopt or maintain practices or policies which would deny access to emergency care based on ability to pay. No hospital which maintains an emergency department shall transfer a patient with an emergency medical condition or who is in active labor unless the transfer is performed at the request of the patient or is due to the limited medical resources of the transferring hospital. Hospitals must make transfers to other hospitals in such circumstances and as promptly as dictated by the standard of care and follow reasonable procedures in making transfers to other hospitals including confirmation of acceptance of the transfer by the receiving hospital.(3) The department shall develop definitions by rule, as appropriate, for subsection (1) of this section and, with reference to federal requirements, subsection (2) of this section. The department shall monitor hospital compliance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The department shall report individual instances of possible noncompliance to the state attorney general or the appropriate federal agency.(4) The department shall establish and maintain by rule, consistent with the definition of charity care in RCW 70.170.020, the following:(a) Uniform procedures, data requirements, and criteria for identifying patients receiving charity care; and(b) A definition of residual bad debt including reasonable and uniform standards for collection procedures to be used in efforts to collect the unpaid portions of hospital charges that are the patient's responsibility.(5) For the purpose of providing charity care, each hospital shall develop, implement, and maintain a policy which shall enable indigent persons access to charity care. The policy shall include procedures for identifying patients who may be eligible for health care coverage through medical assistance programs under chapter 74.09 RCW or the Washington health benefit exchange and actively assisting patients to apply for any available coverage. If a hospital determines that a patient or their guarantor is qualified for retroactive health care coverage through the medical assistance programs under chapter 74.09 RCW, a hospital shall assist the patient or guarantor with applying for such coverage. If a hospital determines that a patient or their guarantor qualifies for retroactive health care coverage through the medical assistance programs under chapter 74.09 RCW, a hospital is not obligated to provide charity care under this section to any patient or their guarantor if the patient or their guarantor fails to make reasonable efforts to cooperate with the hospital's efforts to assist them in applying for such coverage. Hospitals may not impose application procedures for charity care or for assistance with retroactive coverage applications which place an unreasonable burden upon the patient or guarantor, taking into account any physical, mental, intellectual, or sensory deficiencies, or language barriers which may hinder the responsible party's capability of complying with application procedures. It is an unreasonable burden to require a patient to apply for any state or federal program where the patient is obviously or categorically ineligible or has been deemed ineligible in the prior 12 months.(a) At a minimum, a hospital owned or operated by a health system that owns or operates three or more acute hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, an acute care hospital with over 300 licensed beds located in the most populous county in Washington, or an acute care hospital with over 200 licensed beds located in a county with at least 450,000 residents and located on Washington's southern border shall grant charity care per the following guidelines:(i) All patients and their guarantors whose income is not more than 300 percent of the federal poverty level, adjusted for family size, shall be deemed charity care patients for the full amount of the patient responsibility portion of their hospital charges;(ii) All patients and their guarantors whose income is between 301 and 350 percent of the federal poverty level, adjusted for family size, shall be entitled to a 75 percent discount for the full amount of the patient responsibility portion of their hospital charges, which may be reduced by amounts reasonably related to assets considered pursuant to (c) of this subsection;(iii) All patients and their guarantors whose income is between 351 and 400 percent of the federal poverty level, adjusted for family size, shall be entitled to a 50 percent discount for the full amount of the patient responsibility portion of their hospital charges, which may be reduced by amounts reasonably related to assets considered pursuant to (c) of this subsection.(b) At a minimum, a hospital not subject to (a) of this subsection shall grant charity care per the following guidelines:(i) All patients and their guarantors whose income is not more than 200 percent of the federal poverty level, adjusted for family size, shall be deemed charity care patients for the full amount of the patient responsibility portion of their hospital charges;(ii) All patients and their guarantors whose income is between 201 and 250 percent of the federal poverty level, adjusted for family size, shall be entitled to a 75 percent discount for the full amount of the patient responsibility portion of their hospital charges, which may be reduced by amounts reasonably related to assets considered pursuant to (c) of this subsection; and(iii) All patients and their guarantors whose income is between 251 and 300 percent of the federal poverty level, adjusted for family size, shall be entitled to a 50 percent discount for the full amount of the patient responsibility portion of their hospital charges, which may be reduced by amounts reasonably related to assets considered pursuant to (c) of this subsection.(c)(i) If a hospital considers the existence, availability, and value of assets in order to reduce the discount extended, it must establish and make publicly available a policy on asset considerations and corresponding discount reductions.(ii) If a hospital considers assets, the following types of assets shall be excluded from consideration:(A) The first $5,000 of monetary assets for an individual or $8,000 of monetary assets for a family of two, and $1,500 of monetary assets for each additional family member. The value of any asset that has a penalty for early withdrawal shall be the value of the asset after the penalty has been paid;(B) Any equity in a primary residence;(C) Retirement plans other than 401(k) plans;(D) One motor vehicle and a second motor vehicle if it is necessary for employment or medical purposes;(E) Any prepaid burial contract or burial plot; and(F) Any life insurance policy with a face value of $10,000 or less.(iii) In considering assets, a hospital may not impose procedures which place an unreasonable burden on the responsible party. Information requests from the hospital to the responsible party for the verification of assets shall be limited to that which is reasonably necessary and readily available to substantiate the responsible party's qualification for charity sponsorship and may not be used to discourage application for such sponsorship. Only those facts relevant to eligibility may be verified and duplicate forms of verification may not be demanded.(A) In considering monetary assets, one current account statement shall be considered sufficient for a hospital to verify a patient's assets.(B) In the event that no documentation for an asset is available, a hospital shall rely upon a written and signed statement from the responsible party.(iv) Asset information obtained by the hospital in evaluating a patient for charity care eligibility shall not be used for collection activities.(v) Nothing in this section prevents a hospital from considering assets as required by the centers for medicare and medicaid services related to medicare cost reporting.(6) Each hospital shall post and prominently display notice of charity care availability. Notice must be posted in all languages spoken by more than ten percent of the population of the hospital service area. Notice must be displayed in at least the following locations:(a) Areas where patients are admitted or registered;(b) Emergency departments, if any; and(c) Financial service or billing areas where accessible to patients.(7) Current versions of the hospital's charity care policy, a plain language summary of the hospital's charity care policy, and the hospital's charity care application form must be available on the hospital's website. The summary and application form must be available in all languages spoken by more than ten percent of the population of the hospital service area.(8)(a) All hospital billing statements and other written communications concerning billing or collection of a hospital bill by a hospital must include the following or a substantially similar statement prominently displayed on the first page of the statement in both English and the second most spoken language in the hospital's service area:You may qualify for free care or a discount on your hospital bill, whether or not you have insurance. Please contact our financial assistance office at (([website] and [phone number]))...(website)... and ...(phone number)....(b) Nothing in (a) of this subsection requires any hospital to alter any preprinted hospital billing statements existing as of October 1, 2018.(9) Hospital obligations under federal and state laws to provide meaningful access for limited English proficiency and non-English-speaking patients apply to information regarding billing and charity care. Hospitals shall develop standardized training programs on the hospital's charity care policy and use of interpreter services, and provide regular training for appropriate staff, including the relevant and appropriate staff who perform functions relating to registration, admissions, or billing.(10) Each hospital shall make every reasonable effort to determine:(a) The existence or nonexistence of private or public sponsorship which might cover in full or part the charges for care rendered by the hospital to a patient;(b) The annual family income of the patient as classified under federal poverty income guidelines as of the time the health care services were provided, or at the time of application for charity care if the application is made within two years of the time of service, the patient has been making good faith efforts towards payment of health care services rendered, and the patient demonstrates eligibility for charity care; and(c) The eligibility of the patient for charity care as defined in this chapter and in accordance with hospital policy. An initial determination of sponsorship status shall precede collection efforts directed at the patient.(11) At the hospital's discretion, a hospital may consider applications for charity care at any time, including any time there is a change in a patient's financial circumstances.(12) The department shall monitor the distribution of charity care among hospitals, with reference to factors such as relative need for charity care in hospital service areas and trends in private and public health coverage. The department shall prepare reports that identify any problems in distribution which are in contradiction of the intent of this chapter. The report shall include an assessment of the effects of the provisions of this chapter on access to hospital and health care services, as well as an evaluation of the contribution of all purchasers of care to hospital charity care.(13) The department shall issue a report on the subjects addressed in this section at least annually, with the first report due on July 1, 1990.Sec. 4. RCW 70.41.020 and 2021 c 157 s 3 and 2021 c 61 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms, whenever used in this chapter, shall be deemed to have the following meanings:(1) "Aftercare" means the assistance provided by a lay caregiver to a patient under this chapter after the patient's discharge from a hospital. The assistance may include, but is not limited to, assistance with activities of daily living, wound care, medication assistance, and the operation of medical equipment. "Aftercare" includes assistance only for conditions that were present at the time of the patient's discharge from the hospital. "Aftercare" does not include:(a) Assistance related to conditions for which the patient did not receive medical care, treatment, or observation in the hospital; or(b) Tasks the performance of which requires licensure as a health care provider.(2)(a) "Audio-only telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of audio-only technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.(b) "Audio-only telemedicine" does not include:(i) The use of facsimile or email; or(ii) The delivery of health care services that are customarily delivered by audio-only technology and customarily not billed as separate services by the provider, such as the sharing of laboratory results.(3) "Department" means the Washington state department of health.(4) "Discharge" means a patient's release from a hospital following the patient's admission to the hospital.(5) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine.(6) "Emergency care to victims of sexual assault" means medical examinations, procedures, and services provided by a hospital emergency room to a victim of sexual assault following an alleged sexual assault.(7) "Emergency contraception" means any health care treatment approved by the food and drug administration that prevents pregnancy, including but not limited to administering two increased doses of certain oral contraceptive pills within seventy-two hours of sexual contact.(8) "Emergency medical condition" means:(a) A condition of such severity that the absence of immediate medical attention could result in: (i) Placing the health of an individual or, with respect to a pregnant person, the health of the pregnant person or their embryo or fetus in serious jeopardy; (ii) serious impairment to bodily functions; or (iii) serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part;(b) With respect to a pregnant person who is having contractions: (i) That there is inadequate time to affect a safe transfer to another hospital before delivery; or (ii) that transfer may pose a threat to the health or safety of the pregnant person or their embryo or fetus; or(c) Any of the following conditions: Ectopic pregnancy; emergent complications resulting from pregnancy or of pregnancy loss; previable preterm premature rupture of membranes; emergent placental abnormalities; or emergent hypertensive disorders, such as preeclampsia.(9) "Hospital" means any institution, place, building, or agency which provides accommodations, facilities and services over a continuous period of twenty-four hours or more, for observation, diagnosis, or care, of two or more individuals not related to the operator who are suffering from illness, injury, deformity, or abnormality, or from any other condition for which obstetrical, medical, or surgical services would be appropriate for care or diagnosis. "Hospital" as used in this chapter does not include hotels, or similar places furnishing only food and lodging, or simply domiciliary care; nor does it include clinics, or physician's offices where patients are not regularly kept as bed patients for twenty-four hours or more; nor does it include nursing homes, as defined and which come within the scope of chapter 18.51 RCW; nor does it include birthing centers, which come within the scope of chapter 18.46 RCW; nor does it include ((psychiatric))behavioral health hospitals, which come within the scope of chapter 71.12 RCW; nor any other hospital, or institution specifically intended for use in the diagnosis and care of those suffering from mental illness, intellectual disability, convulsive disorders, or other abnormal mental condition. Furthermore, nothing in this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant thereto shall be construed as authorizing the supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment of residents or patients in any hospital conducted for those who rely primarily upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well recognized church or religious denominations.(((9)))(10) "Immediate jeopardy" means a situation in which the hospital's noncompliance with one or more statutory or regulatory requirements has placed the health and safety of patients in its care at risk for serious injury, serious harm, serious impairment, or death.(((10)))(11) "Lay caregiver" means any individual designated as such by a patient under this chapter who provides aftercare assistance to a patient in the patient's residence. "Lay caregiver" does not include a long-term care worker as defined in RCW 74.39A.009.(((11)))(12) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient receiving health care services through telemedicine.(((12)))(13) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.(((13)))(14) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.(((14)))(15) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.125.030.(((15)))(16) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment. "Telemedicine" includes audio-only telemedicine, but does not include facsimile or email.(((16)))(17) "Victim of sexual assault" means a person who alleges or is alleged to have been sexually assaulted and who presents as a patient.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---